Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 16. Public Indebtedness

§ 1. Limitation on state debt.

The State of Wyoming shall not, in any manner, create any indebtedness exceeding one per centum on the assessed value of the taxable property in the state, as shown by the last general assessment for taxation, preceding; except to suppress insurrection or to provide for the public defense.

Cross references. —

As to taxation and revenue generally, see art. 15, § 1 to 19, Wyo. Const.

As to funds of state and political subdivisions, see §§

9-4-101

to

9-4-904

.

As to taxation generally, see title 39.

This section and art. 16, § 2, Wyo. Const., are separate, though related.

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Debt limit of this section and art. 16, § 3, Wyo. Const., compared. —

The state's debt limit is one percent under the provisions of this section, while the debt limit for a political subdivision is four percent under the provisions of art. 16, § 3, Wyo. Const.Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

There is no violation of this section if indebtedness is not state debt,

or if liability is limited so as not to be a charge on the taxpayers of the state. State ex rel. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

Section not violated. —

Act authorizing trustees of the university to borrow from federal agencies for construction of a building, and to pledge income from the university permanent land fund for repayment, does not pledge the general credit, and does not violate constitutional provision limiting the state's indebtedness. Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1934).

School districts are subdivisions of county

within the provisions for creating debts only by a vote of the people. West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Obligation not “debt” if not potentially payable with tax revenues. —

If there is no present legal potential that an obligation will have to be paid from revenues resulting from the exercise by a governmental entity of its power to tax, the obligation is not a debt within the constitutional provisions relative to the amount of debt and voter approval of the debt. State ex rel. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

“Revenue bond” or “special fund” doctrine, constitutionally, does not incur debt.

Under this doctrine, if an obligation is payable solely from revenues resulting from the project for which the obligation was incurred and not from taxes, a debt within the constitutional limitations is not incurred. State ex rel. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

“The assessed value of the taxable property in the state,”

referred to in this section, is there mentioned only as a limit on the amount of total authorized indebtedness the state may incur, if it wishes to become a debtor over and above normal, operating expenses by obtaining voter approval of any debt in excess of taxes for the current year. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Taxes defined. —

Taxes are the enforced proportional contributions from persons and property, levied by the state by virtue of its sovereignty for the support of government and all public needs. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Only way to conform to prohibition of this section

and art. 16, § 2, Wyo. Const., is to stay within their clear limits without an election or submit the debt proposition to a vote of the people for approval. To hold otherwise would be to unlock the doors and grant the legislature unbridled authority to create debt without limitation, contrary to what the state's founding fathers, with approval of the people, conceived to be reasonable restraints. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Purpose in endeavoring to catalog transaction involving public entity as lease

rather than a sale is often to circumvent statutory or constitutional debt limitations, or it is to avoid statutory or constitutional restrictions on expenditures exceeding annual income.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Intent of parties is determinative

as to whether or not the transaction is a lease or a sale.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

When debt is unconstitutional. —

A debt is unconstitutional when, if income from an authorized source is insufficient, the remainder must be paid out of tax money of the state. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Fact that tax collected goes into special account of general fund

has no constitutional implications. It still remains a tax subject to constitutional restrictions, which cannot be avoided by accounting procedures. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Revenue bonds paid from future excise tax revenues held unconstitutional. —

Revenue bonds issued by the Wyoming community development authority, for the payment of which excise tax revenue to be derived in future years is committed under the so-called “special” fund theory, come within the debt limit prohibitions of this section and art. 16, § 2, Wyo. Const.Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

A pledge by a state agency and the legislature to pay off bonds issued for money borrowed by the Wyoming community development authority from revenues to be derived from excise taxes, in whole or in part, to be collected in the future is unconstitutional. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Transportation commission loan unconstitutional. —

Section

24-11-101

is unconstitutionally applied when the loan terms from the Wyoming community development authority require that the debt be paid from future excise taxes to be collected beyond the current year in which the loan is made. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Article 13, § 3, Wyo. Const., does not prohibit municipal corporation from borrowing within applicable limitations of this article.

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Voting at bond elections. —

A statute providing that only taxpayers might vote at a bond election was unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyoming Community Dev. Auth., 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978); State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Defeating Tax Levies to Recover Excess Taxes,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 233.

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

§ 2. Creation of state debt in excess of taxes for current year.

No debt in excess of the taxes for the current year, shall in any manner be created in the State of Wyoming, unless the proposition to create such debt shall have been submitted to a vote of the people and by them approved; except to suppress insurrection or to provide for the public defense.

Basic intent and purpose of this section,

limiting incurrence of state debt beyond the current year's taxes, is to prohibit the legislature from binding subsequent legislatures to make appropriations of money in subsequent fiscal years. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978); State ex rel. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

This section and art. 16, § 1, Wyo. Const., are separate, though related.

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

There is no violation of this section if indebtedness is not state debt,

or if liability is limited so as not to be a charge on the taxpayers of the state. State ex rel. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

Nor where debt liquidated by funds other than tax revenues. —

A debt is not created within the constitutional restrictions by issuance of statutorily authorized bonds which are to be liquidated only by funds other than those derived from taxes. State ex rel. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

Section not violated. —

Act authorizing trustees of the university to borrow from federal agencies for construction of a building, and to pledge income from the university permanent land fund for repayment, does not pledge the general credit, and does not violate constitutional provision limiting the state's indebtedness. Arnold v. Bond, 47 Wyo. 236, 34 P.2d 28,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1934).

This section does not in any way limit “taxes”

to any particular type and the word is construed to mean taxes of every type. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

This section in its use of the term “taxes” includes every sort, in whatever form the legislature elects to take them. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

And in its prohibitions does not relate only to ad valorem tax. —

See Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

This section makes no distinction as to old taxes and new taxes.

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Taxes defined. —

Taxes are the enforced proportional contributions from persons and property, levied by the state by virtue of its sovereignty for the support of government and all public needs. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Only way to conform to prohibition of this section

and art. 16, § 1, Wyo. Const., is to stay within their clear limits without an election or submit the debt proposition to a vote of the people for approval. To hold otherwise would be to unlock the doors and grant the legislature unbridled authority to create debt without limitation, contrary to what the state's founding fathers, with approval of the people, conceived to be reasonable restraints. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Purpose in endeavoring to catalog transaction involving public entity as lease

rather than a sale is often to circumvent statutory or constitutional debt limitations, or it is to avoid statutory or constitutional restrictions on expenditures exceeding annual income.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Intent of parties is determinative

as to whether or not the transaction is a lease or a sale.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

When debt is unconstitutional. —

A debt is unconstitutional when, if income from an authorized source is insufficient, the remainder must be paid out of tax money of the state. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Fact that tax collected goes into special account of general fund

has no constitutional implications. It still remains a tax subject to constitutional restrictions, which cannot be avoided by accounting procedures. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Revenue bonds paid from future excise tax revenues held unconstitutional. —

Revenue bonds issued by the Wyoming community development authority, for the payment of which excise tax revenue to be derived in future years is committed under the so-called “special” fund theory, come within the debt limit prohibitions of this section and art. 16, § 1, Wyo. Const.Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

A pledge by a state agency and the legislature to pay off bonds issued for money borrowed by the Wyoming community development authority from revenues to be derived from excise taxes, in whole or in part, to be collected in the future is unconstitutional. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Transportation commission loan unconstitutional. —

Section

24-11-101

is unconstitutionally applied when the loan terms from the Wyoming community development authority require that the debt be paid from future excise taxes to be collected beyond the current year in which the loan is made. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Article 13, § 3, Wyo. Const., does not prohibit municipal corporation from borrowing within applicable limitations of this article.

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

Voting at bond elections. —

A statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections is unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

School districts are subdivisions of county

within the provision for creating debts only by a vote of the people. West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Irrigation district law

was not violative of this section. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyoming Community Dev. Auth., 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 3. Limitation on county debt.

No county in the State of Wyoming shall in any manner create any indebtedness, exceeding two per centum on the assessed value of taxable property in such county, as shown by the last general assessment, preceding; provided, however, that any county, city, town, village or other subdivision thereof in the State of Wyoming, may bond its public debt existing at the time of the adoption of this constitution, in any sum not exceeding four per centum on the assessed value of the taxable property in such county, city, town, village or other subdivision, as shown by the last general assessment for taxation.

Debt limit of this section and art. 16, § 1, Wyo. Const., compared. —

The state's debt limit is one percent under the provisions of art. 16, § 1, Wyo. Const., while the debt limit for a political subdivision is four percent under the provisions of this section. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Section applies to all county debts. —

The limitation of indebtedness providing that no county shall create any indebtedness exceeding two percent on the assessed value of taxable property, and that no debt in excess of the taxes for the current year shall be created by any county except by vote of the people, applies to all debts of the county, including compulsory obligations imposed by law for salaries or bounties or voluntary obligations entered into for any purpose. Grand I. & N. W. R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1896).

Apportionment of debt where new county created from existing county. —

Where a new county is created from an existing county, the provisions hereof do not apply to the apportionment of the debt of the parent county to the new county. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

School districts are subdivisions of county

within the provision for creating debts only by a vote of the people. West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Applicability

This section and art. 16, §§ 4 and 5, Wyo. Const., are not involved with the constitutionality of the Wyoming community development authority, since under the terms of the Wyoming Community Development Authority Act, the authority is not and cannot be a political subdivision. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Because any debt created by a housing authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-10-108

was not a general obligation and was payable only from sources other than the county's taxing authority, Wyo. Const. art. 16 §§ 3, 4, and 5 did not apply.
Gronberg v. Teton County Hous. Auth., 2011 WY 13, 247 P.3d 35,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2011).

Purpose in endeavoring to catalog transaction involving public entity as lease

rather than a sale is often to circumvent statutory or constitutional debt limitations, or it is to avoid statutory or constitutional restrictions on expenditures exceeding annual income.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Intent of parties is determinative

as to whether or not the transaction is a lease or a sale.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Refunding bonds. —

A county has authority to issue refunding bonds. Board of Comm'rs v. Rollins, 9 Wyo. 281, 62 P. 351,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1900).

Where indebtedness has been lawfully created during territorial days and was within four percent on the adoption of the constitution, the county had authority to issue funding bonds not exceeding four percent of the assessed valuation of property. Board of County Comm'rs v. Rollins Inv. Co., 3 Wyo. 470, 27 P. 683,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1891).

The refunding of the bonded indebtedness of a school district is not the creation of the debt under this section. Miller v. School Dist., 5 Wyo. 217, 39 P. 879,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1895).

Stated

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1959).

Cited

in

State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

§ 4. Creation of county or municipal debt in excess of taxes for current year.

No debt in excess of the taxes for the current year shall, in any manner, be created by any county or subdivision thereof, or any city, town or village, or any subdivision thereof in the State of Wyoming, unless the proposition to create such debt shall have been submitted to a vote of the people thereof and by them approved.

Section applies to all county debts. —

The limitation of indebtedness, providing that no county shall create any indebtedness exceeding two percent on the assessed value of taxable property, and that no debt in excess of the taxes for the current year shall be created by any county except by vote of the people, applies to all debts of the county, including compulsory obligations imposed by law for salaries or bounties or voluntary obligations entered into for any purpose. Grand I. & N. W. R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1896).

Liability of city for official neglect. —

Constitutional provision has been uniformly held not to apply in cases of liability of the city arising out of the neglect of officials to do their duty in connection with special assessments, to purchaser of improvement bonds. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264, 62 P.2d 304,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936), reh'g denied, 63 Wyo. 352, 182 P.2d 840,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1947).

Tax for county revenue is laid distinctively for county as opposed to state purposes

and is not applicable to the payment of a deficiency in state levies for which a county may have become responsible. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

The liability imposed on a county for its uncollected levy of its quota of state taxes, and for interest thereon, and to make a special levy for the deficiency, is not a debt within this section, through the deficiency cannot be paid from the county revenue, and no levy for an anticipated deficiency is permissible. State v. Board of Comm'rs, 8 Wyo. 104, 55 P. 451,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1898).

Apportionment of debt. —

The apportionment of a debt between an old county and a new one created out of its territory is merely a division of existing obligations, for which the citizens and taxable property of both counties are liable, so that the provisions of this section have no application. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

The legislature, having plenary power over school districts, may provide for the division of the property and the apportionment of debts in the reorganization of school districts. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Applicability. —

Because any debt created by a housing authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-10-108

was not a general obligation and was payable only from sources other than the county's taxing authority, Wyo. Const. art. 16 §§ 3, 4, and 5 did not apply.
Gronberg v. Teton County Hous. Auth., 2011 WY 13, 247 P.3d 35,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2011).

Component districts may be held liable to pay their proportionate share of existing debts.

Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Existing debts cannot automatically and arbitrarily be spread evenly over the entire area included in a unified school district. The fact that such was done in a county unification makes the allocation suspect. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

There must be a bona fide allocation of debts to any area according to benefits received by that area from additional assets being brought into the unification. Lund v. Schrader, 492 P.2d 202,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1971).

Purchase to be paid for out of revenue from property bought. —

The purchase of property by a city or town to be paid for solely out of revenue from the property purchased does not create a debt or liability in violation of this section. Town of Lovell v. Menhall, 386 P.2d 109,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1963).

Where a purchase contract itself created a “special fund” for payment of parking meters and specifically provided that the town had no obligation to pay for the meters from any other source, it is not inhibited by this section. Town of Lovell v. Menhall, 386 P.2d 109,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1963).

Revenue bonds excluded from debt limitations. —

“Revenue” or “special fund” bonds are not subject to constitutional or statutory debt limitations.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Refunding securities. —

The refunding of the bonded indebtedness of a school district is not creation of the debt, within the provisions of this section. Miller v. School Dist., 5 Wyo. 217, 39 P. 879,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1895).

The provisions of §

16-5-110

, which authorizes the proceeds of refunding public securities to be placed in escrow instead of immediately applying said proceeds to the retirement of the public securities to be refunded, does not constitute the creation of a debt in excess of taxes for the current year without an approving election. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Plaintiff's authorized payment of $79,285.50 refunding bond expenses from refunding bond proceeds, pursuant to §

16-5-109

, did not constitute the creation of a debt in excess of taxes for the current year without an approving election, said amount not having been included in plaintiff's 1965-1966 budget. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

The concurrent running of interest on both the refunding bonds and on some of the bonds to be refunded during the maximum 15-year escrow term, authorized by §§

16-5-105

and

16-5-110

does not constitute the creation of a debt in excess of taxes for the current year without an approving election. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Revolving local improvement fund. —

This section is not violated by ch. 155, Laws 1953, authorizing a municipality to set up a revolving local improvement fund from the proceeds of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes, from which the fund city may annually deposit in the local improvement district fund a sum sufficient to meet the difference between the principal amount of assessments due that year and the amount of assessments actually collected that year. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Purpose in endeavoring to catalog transaction involving public entity as lease

rather than a sale is often to circumvent statutory or constitutional debt limitations, or it is to avoid statutory or constitutional restrictions on expenditures exceeding annual income.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Intent of parties is determinative

as to whether or not the transaction is a lease or a sale.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

No debt when obligation payable from income of self-sustaining public utilities. —

No debt is created within the constitutional limiting provision when the obligation is payable from the income of self-sustaining public utilities. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Such as fund created from service charges. —

There is no debt against the municipality created within the purview of the constitutional limitation when the amounts due are payable solely from a special fund, not fed by taxes where prohibited, created from service charges only collected from users; service charges are not a tax. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

An agreement to pay a fixed rate for an important service, such as water, electricity, gas or other municipal necessaries, over a period of years, upon an as-needed basis, with periodic payment, creates no debt in the sense of the constitutional requirement. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Neither contract between several municipalities, authorizing an agency organized by them under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-110

, to acquire electrical energy and providing, in turn, for its sale to the municipalities, which contract was to remain in effect for 40 years, nor the issuance by the agency of revenue bonds, secured by a pledge of payments to be received from the municipalities under the contract, created a debt within the constitutional limitation of this section. The contract specifically provided that payments due for electricity sold to each municipality was payable only from revenues derived from the retail sale of electricity to the customers of the municipal distribution system. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

School districts are subdivisions of county

within provision prohibiting creation of debt without vote of people. West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Sanitary districts. —

The indebtedness of a sanitary district is limited by this section. In re West Highway Sanitary & Improvement Dist., 77 Wyo. 384, 317 P.2d 495,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1957).

A statute which authorized the trustees of a sanitary and improvement district to issue bonds without an election if 40 percent of the electors did not object to issuance of the bonds violated this section. In re West Highway Sanitary & Improvement Dist., 77 Wyo. 384, 317 P.2d 495,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1957).

Irrigation district law

was not violative of this section. Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

No application to Wyoming community development authority. —

This section and art. 16, §§ 3 and 5, Wyo. Const., are not involved with the constitutionality of the Wyoming community development authority, since under the terms of the Wyoming Community Development Authority Act, the authority is not and cannot be a political subdivision. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Voting at bond elections. —

A statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections is unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Statute requiring payment of realty tax as a qualification to vote at a school bond election was invalid. West v. School Dist., 37 Wyo. 36, 258 P. 583,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1927).

Law for high school districts on bond issues where property and nonproperty owners may vote was held not to violate constitution regarding elections or elections creating debts. State ex rel. Voiles v. Johnson County High Sch., 43 Wyo. 494, 5 P.2d 255,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1931).

Quoted

in

Erickson v. School Dist., 67 Wyo. 216, 217 P.2d 887,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1950); Elementary Sch. Dist. v. District Boundary Bd., 454 P.2d 237,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1969); Sweetwater County Planning Comm. for Organization of School Dists. v. Hinkle, 491 P.2d 1234,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1971).

Stated

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1959).

Cited

in

Cooper v. Town of Pinedale, 1 P.3d 1197,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 2000).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For comment, “Coping with Expansion: The State as Local Government Financier,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 577 (1975).